Connecticut, session 2026, HB05569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Local newspaper" means any print or digital publication:
(A) That primarily serves the needs of a regional or local community;
(B) For which the primary content of such publication is original
content derived from primary sources and relating to news and current
events;
(C) Which publication's publisher:
(i) Employs at least one full-time local news journalist who resides in
such regional or local community;
(ii) Employs not more than seven hundred fifty employees; and
LCO No. 2978 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5569
(iii) Is not (I) an organization described in Section 501(c)(4), 501(c)(5)
or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent
corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as amended
from time to time, (II) a political organization, as defined in Section
527(e) of said Internal Revenue Code, or (III) controlled by one or more
organizations set forth in subclause (I) or (II) of this clause; and
(D) That did not receive more than one hundred thousand dollars in
the aggregate for the preceding income or taxable year from
organizations set forth in subparagraph (B)(iii) of this subdivision;
(2) "Local news journalist" means any individual who regularly
gathers, prepares, produces, collects, edits, photographs, records,
directs the recording of, writes, presents or reports news or information
that concerns local events or other matters of local public interest;
(3) "Qualified local media advertising expenses" means amounts paid
or incurred in the ordinary course of a trade or business for advertising
in a local newspaper or advertising on any broadcast radio or television
station licensed by the Federal Communications Commission to serve a
local community; and
(4) "Small business" means a business located in the state with fifty
employees or less.
(b) For the income or taxable years commencing on or after January
1, 2027, and prior to January 1, 2032, there shall be allowed a credit for
small businesses against the tax imposed under chapter 208 or 229 of the
general statutes, other than the liability imposed by section 12-707 of the
general statutes. The credit shall be a percentage of the qualified local
media advertising expenses paid or incurred by such small business for
an income or taxable year as follows:
(1) For the income or taxable year commencing on or after January 1,
2027, and prior to January 1, 2028, eighty per cent of the qualified local
media advertising expenses paid or incurred by the small business for
LCO No. 2978 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5569
said income or taxable year, not to exceed five thousand dollars; and
(2) For each of the income or taxable years commencing on or after
January 1, 2028, and prior to January 1, 2032, fifty per cent of the
qualified local media advertising expenses paid or incurred by the small
business for the applicable income or taxable year, not to exceed two
thousand five hundred dollars for each such income or taxable year.
(c) If the taxpayer is an S corporation or an entity treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes, the credit may be claimed
by the taxpayer's shareholders or partners. If the taxpayer is a single
member limited liability company that is disregarded as an entity
separate from its owner, the credit may be claimed by such limited
liability company's owner, provided such owner is subject to the tax
imposed under chapter 208 or 229 of the general statutes.
(d) No small business may claim a credit for and deduct as a business
expense the same qualified local media advertising expenses.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section